Utah statutes.
7-18a-103.   Application of Utah Revised Business Corporation Act.
A foreign depository institution authorized to transact business in this state
through an agency, branch, or representative office shall comply with Title
16, Chapter 10a, Utah Revised Business Corporation Act.
